District of Columbia statutes.
48-832.02

Compliance.

Compliance with the requirements of this subchapter is required in all contracts between a pharmacy benefits manager and a covered entity entered into in the District of Columbia or by a covered entity in the District of Columbia executed after May 18, 2004.

History

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 202, 51 DCR 3688
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5062(d), 53 DCR 6899

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-192 substituted “and a covered entity entered into in the District of Columbia or by a covered entity in the District of Columbia” for “and a covered entity”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of AccessRx Act Clarification Temporary Amendment of Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-154, September 19, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 7926).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of AccessRX Act Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-370, May 5, 2006, 53 DCR 4059).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5062(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).